Utah statutes.
55-12-118.   Responsibilities of state courts, departments, agencies, and officers.

The courts, departments, agencies and officers of this state and its subdivisions shall enforce this compact and do all things appropriate to the effectuation of its purposes and intent which may be within their respective jurisdictions.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 155, 2005 General Session

